California statutes. Business and Professions Code
A psychological corporation is a corporation that is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, so long as that corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services who are licensed as psychologists, podiatrists, registered nurses, optometrists, marriage and family therapists, professional clinical counselors, clinical social workers, chiropractors, acupuncturists, physicians and surgeons, naturopathic doctors, or midwives are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, this article, and all other statutes and regulations now or hereafter enacted or adopted pertaining to that corporation and the conduct of its
 affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 49.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2996.

It shall constitute unprofessional conduct and a violation of this chapter for any person licensed under this chapter to violate, attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, or assist in or abet the violation of, or conspire to violate, any provision or term of this article, the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, or any regulations duly adopted under those laws.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2996.1.

A psychological corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute or regulation now or hereafter in effect. In the conduct of its practice, it shall observe and be bound by such statutes and regulations to the same extent as a person licensed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2996.2.

The income of a psychological corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of such shareholder or his or her shares in the psychological corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2997.

Except as provided in Sections 13401.5 and 13403 of the Corporations Code, each shareholder, director and officer of a psychological corporation, except an assistant secretary and an assistant treasurer, shall be a licensed person as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2998.

The name of a psychological corporation and any name or names under which it may render professional services shall contain one of the words specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2902, and wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2999.

The board may adopt and enforce regulations to carry out the purposes and objectives of this article, including regulations requiring (a) that the bylaws of a psychological corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of that corporation owned by a disqualified person, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, or a deceased person, shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of that corporation within any time as those regulations may provide, and (b) that a psychological corporation shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its patients or clients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 888, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Psychological Testing Technicians [2999.100. - 2999.106.]

2999.100.

(a) “Psychological testing technician” means an individual not otherwise authorized to provide psychological and neuropsychological testing under this chapter who is registered with the board and is authorized to perform the following functions:

(1) Administer and score standardized objective psychological and neuropsychological tests.

(2) Observe and describe clients’ test behavior and test responses.

(b) A psychological testing technician shall not perform the following functions:

(1) Select tests or versions of tests.

(2) Interpret test results.

(3) Write test reports.

(4) Provide test feedback to clients.

(c) A psychological testing technician shall only use the titles “psychological testing technician” or “neuropsychological testing technician.” A psychological testing technician shall not use the title “psychologist” or any title incorporating the word “psychologist.”

(d) Failure to comply with this section shall be grounds for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 622, Sec. 1.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 2999.105.)
-------------------------------------------

2999.101.

To register as a psychological testing technician, a person shall submit the following to the board:

(a) An application that includes the following information:

(1) The applicant’s name, identification, and contact information.

(2) The applicant’s supervisor’s name, license number, and contact information.

(3) Attestation under penalty of perjury that the information provided on the application is true and correct.

(b) (1) Proof of completion
 of a bachelor’s degree or graduate degree, or proof of current enrollment in a graduate degree program, from a regionally accredited university, college, or professional school, in any of the following areas:

(A) Psychology, including any field of specialization. 

(B) Education, with the field of specialization in educational psychology, counseling psychology, or school psychology.

(C) Neuroscience, cognitive science, or behavioral science, including any field of specialization.

(2) The board shall make the final determination as to whether a degree or degree program meets the requirements of this subdivision.

(c) (1) Proof of completion of a minimum of 80 hours total of education and training relating to psychological or neuropsychological test administration and scoring that includes the following:

(A) At least 20 hours of direct observation, including at least 10 hours of direct observation of a licensed psychologist administering and scoring tests, and at least 10 hours of direct observation of either a licensed psychologist or registered psychological testing technician administering and scoring tests.

(B) At least 40 hours of administering and scoring tests in the presence of a licensed psychologist.

(C) At least 20 hours of education on topics including law and ethics, confidentiality,
 and best practices for test administration and scoring.

(2) Education and training may be obtained by doing any combination of the following:

(A) Participating in individual or group instruction provided by a licensed psychologist.

(B) Engaging in independent learning directed by a licensed psychologist.

(C) Completing graduate-level coursework at a regionally accredited university, college, or professional school.

(D) Taking continuing education courses from organizations with board approval pursuant to Section 2915.

(3) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a person engaged in gaining the experience required by this subdivision from administering and scoring psychological and neuropsychological tests.

(d) The registration fee for a psychological testing technician as specified in Section 2987.

(e) Electronic fingerprint image scans for a state- and federal-level criminal offender record information search conducted through the Department of Justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 50.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2999.102.

(a) All psychological testing technician services shall be provided under the direct supervision of a licensed psychologist.

(b) A supervisor of psychological testing technicians shall satisfy all of the following requirements:

(1) Be employed by, or contracted to, the same work setting as the psychological testing technician they are supervising.

(2) Be available in-person, by telephone, or by other appropriate technology at all times the psychological testing technician provides services.

(3) Be responsible for all of the following:

(A) Ensuring that the extent, kind, and quality of the services that the psychological testing technician provides are consistent with the psychological testing technician’s training and experience.

(B) Monitoring the psychological testing technician’s compliance with applicable laws and regulations.

(C) Informing the client prior to the rendering of services by a psychological testing technician that the technician is registered as a psychological testing technician and is functioning under the direction and supervision of the supervisor.

(c) A psychological testing technician shall notify the board of any change to their direct supervisor. To add or change a supervisor, a psychological testing technician shall submit the following:

(1) Registrant’s name, registration number, and contact information.

(2) New or additional supervisor’s name, license number, and contact information.

(3) Current supervisor’s name, license number, and contact information.

(4) Attestation under penalty of perjury that the information provided on the application is true and correct.

(5) The fee to add or change a supervisor for a psychological testing technician, as specified in Section 2987.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 622, Sec. 1.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 2999.105.)
-------------------------------------------

2999.103.

(a) A psychological testing technician shall renew their registration annually by submitting the following to the board:

(1) The registrant’s name, registration number, and contact information.

(2) The supervisor’s name, license number, and contact information.

(3) Disclosure as to whether or not the registrant has been convicted of any violation of the law in this or any other state, the United States or its territories, military court, or other country, omitting traffic infractions under five hundred dollars ($500) not involving alcohol, a dangerous drug, or a controlled substance, since the issuance or
 previous renewal of their registration.

(4) Disclosure as to whether or not the registrant has had a license or registration disciplined by a governmental agency or other disciplinary body, since the issuance or previous renewal of their registration. Discipline includes, but is not limited to, suspension, revocation, voluntary surrender, probation, reprimand, or any other restriction on a license or registration held.

(5) Attestation under penalty of perjury that the information provided on the application is true and correct.

(6) The annual renewal fee for a psychological testing technician as specified in Section 2987.

(b) Without renewal, a psychological testing technician registration expires annually. If the registration expires, then the person
 who was registered:

(1) Shall not provide psychological testing technician services.

(2) Shall renew within 60 days after its expiration and pay the renewal and delinquency fees as specified in Section 2987, or the registration shall be canceled and a new application for registration shall be submitted to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 622, Sec. 1.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 2999.105.)
-------------------------------------------

2999.104.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to expand or constrict the scope of practice of a person who is licensed under any other provision of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 622, Sec. 1.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 2999.105.)
-------------------------------------------

2999.105.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 622, Sec. 1.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2999.106.

(a) The Board of Psychology shall require an applicant for registration as a psychological testing technician, as defined in Section 2999.100, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to Section 144.

(b) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 13.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Optometry [3000. - 3167.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [3000. - 3007.]

3000.

This chapter constitutes the chapter on optometry. It shall be known and may be cited as the Optometry Practice Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3001.

As used in this chapter, an ophthalmic lens is any lens which has a spherical, cylindrical, or prismatic power or value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 75.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3002.

As used in this chapter, a trial frame or test lens is any frame or lens used in testing the eye, which is not sold and is not for sale to clients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 423.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.

As used in this chapter, “optometrist” means a natural person who is licensed to practice optometry in this state under the authority of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 19.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3004.

(a) As used in this chapter, “board” means the California State Board of Optometry.

(b) Any reference in this code or any other code to the “State Board of Optometry” shall be deemed to refer to the “California State Board of Optometry.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 76.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3004.5.

As used in this chapter, “person” means a natural person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other organization, or any combination thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 20.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3005.

As used in this chapter, “place of practice” means any location where optometry is practiced.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3006.

As used in this chapter, the term “advertise” and any of its variants include the use of a newspaper, magazine, the Internet, or other publication, book, notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, handbill, poster, bill, sign, placard, card, label, tag, window display, store sign, radio announcement, or any other means or methods now or hereafter employed to bring to the attention of the public the practice of optometry or the prescribing, fitting, or sale, in connection therewith, of lenses, frames, or other accessories or appurtenances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 564, Sec. 2.   (AB 1708)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3007.

An optometrist shall retain a patient’s records for a minimum of seven years from the date he or she completes treatment of the patient. If the patient is a minor, the patient’s records shall be retained for a minimum of seven years from the date he or she completes treatment of the patient and at least until the patient reaches 19 years of age.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 276, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [3010.1. - 3030.]

3010.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the California State Board of Optometry in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 77.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.5.

(a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a California State Board of Optometry in which the enforcement of this chapter is vested. The board consists of 11 members, 5 of whom shall be public members and one of the nonpublic members shall be an individual registered as a dispensing optician, spectacle lens dispenser, or contact lens dispenser. The registered dispensing member shall be registered pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 2550) and in good standing with the board.

Six members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

(b) The board shall, with respect to conducting investigations, inquiries, and disciplinary actions
 and proceedings, have the authority previously vested in the board as created pursuant to former Section 3010. The board may enforce any disciplinary actions undertaken by that board.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed. Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 21.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3011.

(a) Members of the board, except the public members and the registered dispensing member, shall be appointed only from persons who are registered optometrists of the State of California and actually engaged in the practice of optometry at the time of appointment or who are members of the faculty of a school of optometry. The public members shall not be a licentiate of the board or of any other board under this division or of any board referred to in Sections 1000 and 3600.

No person except the registered dispensing member, including the public members, shall be eligible to membership on the board who is a stockholder in or owner of or a member of the board of trustees of any school of optometry or who shall be financially interested, directly or
 indirectly, in any concern manufacturing or dealing in optical supplies at wholesale.

No person shall serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive terms.

A member of the faculty of a school of optometry may be appointed to the board; however, no more than two faculty members of schools of optometry may be on the board at any one time. Faculty members of the board shall not serve as public members.

(b) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to appointments made on or after January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 5.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3013.

(a) Each member of the board shall hold office for a term of four years, and shall serve until the appointment and qualification of his or her successor or until one year shall have elapsed since the expiration of the term for which he or she was appointed, whichever first occurs.

(b) Vacancies occurring shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

(c) The Governor shall appoint three of the public members, five members qualified as provided in Section 3011, and the registered dispensing member as provided in Section 3010.5. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member.

(d) No board member serving between January 1, 2000, and June 1, 2002, inclusive, shall be eligible for reappointment.

(e) For initial appointments made on or after January 1, 2003, one of the public members appointed by the Governor and two of the professional members shall serve terms of one year. One of the public members appointed by the Governor and two of the professional members shall serve terms of three years. The remaining public member appointed by the Governor and the remaining two professional members shall serve terms of four years. The public members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each serve for a term of four years.

(f) The initial appointment of a registered dispensing optician, spectacle lens dispenser, or contact lens dispenser member shall replace the
 optometrist member whose term expired on June 1, 2015.

(g) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to appointments made on or after January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 6.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3014.

The board shall elect from its membership a president, a vice president, and a secretary who shall hold office for one year or until the election and qualification of a successor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3014.6.

(a) The board may appoint a person exempt from civil service who shall be designated as an executive officer and who shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the board and vested in the executive officer by this chapter.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 22.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3016.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3017.

The board shall hold regular meetings every calendar quarter.

Special meetings shall be held upon request of a majority of the members of the board or upon the call of the president.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3018.

The board shall keep an accurate record of all of its licensees, proceedings, and meetings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3019.

The board shall keep a record of all prosecutions for violations of this chapter and of all applications for licensure and examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3020.

(a) There shall be established under the California State Board of Optometry a dispensing optician committee to advise and make recommendations to the board regarding the regulation of dispensing opticians, spectacle lens dispensers, and contact lens dispensers, registered pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 2550). The committee shall consist of three members, one of whom shall be a registered dispensing optician registered pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 2550), one of whom shall be a spectacle lens dispenser or contact lens dispenser registered pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 2550),
 one of whom shall be either a public member or an optometrist licensed pursuant to this chapter. The appointments to the committee shall be made by the board and at least one appointed committee member shall be a sitting board member who meets the qualifications described in this section. The board shall stagger the terms of the initial members appointed. The filling of vacancies on the committee shall be made by the
 board.

(b) The committee shall be responsible for:

(1) Recommending registration standards and criteria for the registration of dispensing opticians, nonresident contact lens sellers, spectacle lens dispensers, and contact lens dispensers.

(2) Reviewing of the disciplinary guidelines relating to registered dispensing opticians, nonresident contact lens sellers, spectacle lens dispensers, and contact lens dispensers.

(3) Recommending to the board changes or additions to regulations adopted pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 2550).

(4) Carrying out and implementing all responsibilities and duties imposed upon it pursuant to this
 chapter or as delegated to it by the board.

(c) The committee shall meet at least twice a year and as needed in order to conduct its business.

(d) Recommendations by the committee regarding scope of practice or regulatory changes or additions shall be approved, modified, or rejected by the board within 90 days of submission of the recommendation to the board. If the board rejects or significantly modifies the intent or scope of the recommendation, the committee may request that the board provide its reasons in writing for rejecting or significantly modifying the recommendation, which shall be provided by the board within 30 days of the request.

(e) Committee members shall serve a term of four years except for the initial staggered terms. A member may be reappointed, but no person shall serve as a member of the committee for more than two consecutive terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 23.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3021.

The board shall have rulemaking authority with respect to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 2550) in accordance with Section 3025. Regulations adopted pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 2550) by the Medical Board of California prior to the effective date of this section shall continue to be valid, except that any reference to the board or division contained therein shall be construed to mean the California State Board of Optometry, unless the context determines otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 81.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3023.

For the purposes of this chapter, the board shall accredit schools, colleges, and universities in or out of this state providing optometric education, that it finds giving a sufficient program of study for the preparation of optometrists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3023.1.

(a) The nonresident contact lens seller program established under Chapter 5.45 (commencing with Section 2546) and the registered dispensing optician, spectacle lens dispensing, and contact lens dispensing programs established under Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 2550) are hereby transferred from the jurisdiction of the Medical Board of California and placed under the jurisdiction of the State Board of Optometry.

(b) All the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdictions of the Medical Board of California under Chapter 5.45 (commencing with Section 2546) and Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 2550) shall be transferred to the State Board of Optometry.

(c) For the performance of the duties and the exercise of the powers vested in the board under Chapter 5.45 (commencing with Section 2546) and Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 2550), the State Board of Optometry shall have possession and control of all records, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, or other property, real or personal, held for the benefit or use by the Medical Board of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 405, Sec. 16.   (AB 684)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3024.

The board may grant or refuse to grant an optometrist license as provided in this chapter and may revoke or suspend the license of any optometrist for any of the causes specified in this chapter.

It shall have the power to administer oaths and to take testimony in the exercise of these functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 4.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3024.5.

(a) Information sent from an email account of the board to a valid email address provided by an applicant, registrant, or licensee is presumed to have been delivered to the provided email address.

(b) In the interest of protecting the privacy of applicants, registrants, and licensees, an email address provided by an applicant, registrant, or licensee to the board pursuant to paragraph (14) of subdivision (a) of Section 3057 or subdivision (d) of Section 2552 shall not be considered a public record and shall not be disclosed pursuant to Section 27 or pursuant to a request under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of
 Title 1 of the Government Code), unless required pursuant to a court order by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, “valid email address” means an email address at which the applicant, registrant, or licensee is currently receiving emails at the time of application for licensure, registration, or renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 24.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3025.

The board may make and promulgate rules and regulations governing procedure of the board, the admission of applicants for examination for a license as an optometrist, and the practice of optometry. All of those rules and regulations shall be in accordance with and not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter. The rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 5.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3025.1.

The board may adopt rules and regulations that are, in its judgment, reasonable and necessary to ensure that optometrists have the knowledge to adequately protect the public health and safety by establishing educational requirements for admission to the examinations for licensure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 12.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

3025.2.

The board may adopt rules and regulations that are, in its judgment, reasonable and necessary to ensure that optometrists have the knowledge to adequately protect the public health and safety by governing its accreditation of schools, colleges, and universities that provide optometric education. In promulgating these rules and regulations, or in extending accreditation, the board may, to the extent that it deems consistent with the purposes of this chapter, recognize, accept, or adopt the advice, recommendation, accreditation, or approval of a nationally recognized accrediting agency or organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3025.5.

The board may adopt regulations prescribing minimum standards governing the optometric services offered or performed, the equipment, or the sanitary conditions, in all offices for the practice of optometry, which are necessary to protect the health and safety of persons availing themselves of the services offered or performed in such offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1464.)
-------------------------------------------

3025.6.

The board may adopt regulations clarifying the level of training and the level of supervision of assistants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1150, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3025.7.

Except as provided in Sections 3102 and 3103, nothing contained in Section 651.3 shall be construed as authorizing the board to adopt, amend, or repeal rules and regulations relating to price fixing or advertising of commodities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3026.

The board may adopt and use a common seal and establish a permanent office or offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 423.)
-------------------------------------------

3027.

The board shall employ an executive officer and other necessary assistance in the carrying out of the provisions of this chapter.

The executive officer shall perform the duties delegated by the board and shall be responsible to it for the accomplishment of those duties. The executive officer shall not be a member of the board. With the approval of the Director of Finance, the board shall fix the salary of the executive officer. The executive officer shall be entitled to traveling and other necessary expenses in the performance
 of the executive officer’s duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 82.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3028.

The Attorney General shall act as the legal counsel for the board and his or her services shall be a charge against it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 426, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3030.

(a) The board, or its designated agent, may at any time inspect either of the following:

(1) Any premise in which optometric services, as defined in Section 3041, are provided or reasonably suspected of being provided.

(2) Any premise in which the services of dispensing, adjusting, or fitting of contact lenses or spectacle lenses are provided or reasonably suspected of being provided.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant the board jurisdiction over the practice of medicine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 564, Sec. 5.   (AB 1708)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Admission to Practice [3040. - 3060.]

3040.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to engage in the practice of optometry or to advertise or hold himself or herself out as an optometrist without a valid, unrevoked California optometrist license. The practice of optometry includes the performing or controlling of any acts set forth in Section 3041.

(b) In any prosecution for a violation of this section, the use of test cards, test lenses, or of trial frames is prima facie evidence of the practice of optometry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 703, Sec. 24.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3041.

(a) The practice of optometry includes the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, and management of disorders and dysfunctions of the visual system, as authorized by this chapter, as well as the provision of habilitative or rehabilitative optometric services, and is the doing of any or all of the following:

(1) The examination of the human eyes and their adnexa, including through the use of all topical and oral diagnostic pharmaceutical agents that are not controlled substances, and the analysis of the human vision system, either subjectively or objectively.

(2) The determination of the powers or range of human vision and the accommodative and refractive states of the human eyes, including the scope of
 their functions and general condition.

(3) The prescribing, using, or directing the use of any optical device in connection with ocular exercises, visual training, vision training, or orthoptics.

(4) The prescribing, fitting, or adaptation of contact and spectacle lenses to, the human eyes, including lenses that may be classified as drugs or devices by any law of the United States or of this state, and diagnostic or therapeutic contact lenses that incorporate a medication or therapy the optometrist is certified to prescribe or provide.

(5) For an optometrist certified pursuant to Section 3041.3, diagnosing and preventing conditions and diseases of the human eyes and their adnexa, and treating nonmalignant conditions and diseases of the anterior segment of the human eyes and their adnexa, including ametropia and
 presbyopia:

(A) Using or prescribing, including for rational off-label purposes, topical and oral prescription and nonprescription therapeutic pharmaceutical agents that are not controlled substances and are not antiglaucoma agents or limited or excluded by subdivision (b). For purposes of this section, “controlled substance” has the same meaning as used in the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code) and the United States Uniform Controlled Substances Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 801 et seq.).

(B) Prescribing the oral analgesic controlled substance codeine with compounds, hydrocodone with compounds, and tramadol as listed in the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code) and the United States Uniform Controlled Substances Act (21
 U.S.C. Sec. 801 et seq.), limited to three days, with referral to an ophthalmologist if the pain persists.

(C) If also certified under subdivision (c), using or prescribing topical and oral antiglaucoma agents for the medical treatment of all primary open-angle, exfoliation, pigmentary, and steroid-induced glaucomas in persons 18 years of age or over. In the case of steroid-induced glaucoma, the prescriber of the steroid medication shall be promptly notified if the prescriber did not refer the patient to the optometrist for treatment.

(D) If also certified under subdivision (d), independent initiation and administration of immunizations for influenza, herpes zoster virus, pneumococcus, and SARS-CoV-2 in compliance with
 recommendations adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code in persons 18 years of age or older.

(E) Utilizing the following techniques and instrumentation necessary for the diagnosis of conditions and diseases of the eye and adnexa:

(i) Laboratory tests or examinations ordered from an outside facility.

(ii) Laboratory tests or examinations performed in a laboratory with a certificate of waiver under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 (CLIA) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 263a; Public Law 100-578), which shall also be allowed for:

(I) Detecting indicators of possible systemic disease that manifests in the eye for the purpose of facilitating appropriate referral to or consultation with a physician and surgeon.

(II) Detecting the presence of SARS-CoV-2 virus.

(iii) Skin testing performed in an office to diagnose ocular allergies, limited to the superficial layer of the skin.

(iv) X-rays ordered from an outside facility.

(v) Other imaging studies ordered from an outside facility subject to prior consultation with an appropriate physician and surgeon.

(vi) Other imaging studies performed in an office, including those that utilize laser or ultrasound
 technology, but excluding those that utilize radiation.

(F) Performing the following procedures, which are excluded from restrictions imposed on the performance of surgery by paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), unless explicitly indicated:
